Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.130

Free venture industry agreements—Effect of failure.

In the event of a failure such as a bankruptcy or dissolution, of a private sector business, industry, or nonprofit organization engaged in a free venture industry agreement, responsibility for obligations under Title 51 RCW must be borne by the city or county responsible for establishment of the free venture industry agreement, as if the city or county had been the employing agency. To ensure that this obligation can be clearly identified and accomplished, and to provide accountability for purposes of the department of labor and industries, a free venture jail industry agreement entered into by a city or county and private sector business, industry, or nonprofit organization should be filed under a separate business license application in accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW, establishing a new and separate account with the department of labor and industries, and not be reported under an existing account for parties to the free venture industry agreement.

[ 2013 c 144 s 38; 1995 c 154 s 3; 1993 c 285 s 13.]